Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.030

Metal property and metallic wire—Requirements for transactions. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive private metal property or nonferrous metal property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state.

(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive private metal property or commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.

(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.

(4)(a) No transaction involving private metal property or nonferrous metal property may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification under the requirements of RCW 19.290.020(1) (d) and (g) except as described in (b) and (c) of this subsection. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 19.290.020.

(b) A scrap metal business that is in compliance with this chapter may pay up to a maximum of $30 in cash, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer for nonferrous metal property. The balance of the value of the transaction may be made by nontransferable check, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer at the time the transaction is made if the scrap metal business digitally captures:

(i) A copy of one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; and

(ii) Either a picture or video of either the material subject to the transaction in the form received or the material subject to the transaction within the vehicle which the material was transported to the scrap metal business.

(c) Payment to individual sellers of private metal property as defined in this chapter may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made. Records of payment for private metal property as defined in this chapter must be kept in the same file or record as all records collected under this subsection and retained and be available for review for two years from the date of the transaction.

(5)(a) A scrap metal business's usage of video surveillance shall be sufficient to comply with subsection (4)(b)(ii) of this section so long as the video captures the material subject to the transaction.

(b) A digital image or picture taken under this section must be available for two years from the date of transaction, while a video recording must be available for 30 days.

(6) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

[ 2022 c 221 s 4; 2013 c 322 s 6; 2008 c 233 s 3; 2007 c 377 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 221 s 4: "Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 221 s 11.]

Findings—Intent—2022 c 221: See note following RCW 19.290.020.

PDFRCW 19.290.030

Metal property and metallic wire—Requirements for transactions. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive nonferrous metal property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state.

(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.

(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.

(4)(a) No transaction involving nonferrous metal property may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification and sign a declaration under the requirements of RCW 19.290.020 except as described in (b) of this subsection. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 19.290.020.

(b) A scrap metal business that is in compliance with this chapter may pay up to a maximum of $30 in cash, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer for nonferrous metal property. The balance of the value of the transaction may be made by nontransferable check, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer at the time the transaction is made if the scrap metal business digitally captures:

(i) A copy of one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; and

(ii) Either a picture or video of either the material subject to the transaction in the form received or the material subject to the transaction within the vehicle which the material was transported to the scrap metal business.

(5)(a) A scrap metal business's usage of video surveillance shall be sufficient to comply with subsection (4)(b)(ii) of this section so long as the video captures the material subject to the transaction.

(b) A digital image or picture taken under this section must be available for two years from the date of transaction, while a video recording must be available for 30 days.

(6) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

[ 2024 c 301 s 5; 2022 c 221 s 4; 2013 c 322 s 6; 2008 c 233 s 3; 2007 c 377 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.

Effective date—2022 c 221 s 4: "Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 221 s 11.]

Findings—Intent—2022 c 221: See note following RCW 19.290.020.